test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_C_zhagay_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: nizhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: nizhagayensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: nizhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: nizhagayensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: nizhagayensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: nizhagayensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: nizhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: nizhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: nizhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gizhagayenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gizhagayenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gizhagayenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: gizhagayensimishiniibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: gizhagayensimishiniibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: gizhagayensimishiniibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gizhagayensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gizhagayensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gizhagayensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gizhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gizhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gizhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ozhagayenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ozhagayenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ozhagayenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ozhagayensimishiniibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ozhagayensimishiniibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ozhagayensimishiniibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ozhagayensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ozhagayensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ozhagayensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ozhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ozhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3zhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ozhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhagayenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhagayenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhagayenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhagayenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhagayenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhagayenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhagayenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhagayenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhagayenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhagayenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: izhagayensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: izhagayensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: izhagayensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: izhagayensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: izhagayensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: izhagayensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: izhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: izhagayensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: izhagayensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: izhagayensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: izhagayensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: izhagayensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: izhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: izhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefzhagay+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: izhagayensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
